Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 31.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201283-1220
Hearing officers;
qualifications.

The department shall conduct hearings
initiated under section 83-1219 using hearing officers. The department may
employ, retain, or approve such qualified hearing officers as are necessary
to conduct the hearings. The hearing officers shall not be persons who are
employees or officers of a local agency which is involved in providing services
to the person with developmental disabilities. A person who otherwise qualifies
to conduct a hearing shall not be considered an employee of the agency solely
because the person is paid by the agency to serve as a hearing officer. No
hearing officer shall participate in any way in any hearing or matter in which
the hearing officer may have a conflict of interest. The department shall have
exclusive original jurisdiction over cases arising under sections 83-1219
to 83-1224, and in no event shall juvenile courts have jurisdiction over such
matters.

Laws 1991, LB 830, § 20;

Laws 2010, LB849, § 31.